src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON SKLI
+V+Inf:skli     # ;
+V+Imp:skli     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:sklir    # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sklis    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:sklidde  # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:skled    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:sklei    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:sklidd   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:skliende # ;

LEXICON SKRIDE
+V+Inf:skride    # ;
+V+Imp:skrid     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:skrider   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:skrir     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrides   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skris     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:skred     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:skredet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:skridende # ;

LEXICON RIDE
+V+Inf:ride    # ;
+V+Imp:rid     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:rider   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:rides   # ; ! Fiks meg
+V+Ind+Prt:red     # ; ! FIks meg
+V+PrfPtc:ridd    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:ridende # ;

LEXICON LIDE
+V+Inf:lide    # ;
+V+Imp:lid     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:lider   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:rides   # ; ! Fiks meg
+V+Ind+Prt:red     # ; ! FIks meg
+V+PrfPtc:lidd    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:lidende # ;

LEXICON KVEDE
+V+Inf:kvede    # ;
+V+Imp:kved     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:kveder   # ; ! Fiks meg
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:rides    # ; ! Fiks meg
+V+Ind+Prt:kvad     # ; ! FIks meg
+V+PrfPtc:kvedet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:kvedende # ;

LEXICON SKRIKE
+V+Inf:skrike    # ;
+V+Imp:skrik     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:skriker   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrikes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:skreik    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:skrek     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:skreket   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:skrikende # ;


LEXICON SKRIVE
             skrive+V+Inf:skrive    # ;
             skrive+V+Imp:skriv     # ;
         skrive+V+Ind+Prs:skriver   # ;
         skrive+V+Ind+Prt:skrev     # ;
 skrive+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:skreiv    # ;
          skrive+V+PrfPtc:skrevet   # ;
          skrive+V+PrsPtc:skrivende # ;

LEXICON SKRYTE
             skryte+V+Inf:skryte    # ;
             skryte+V+Imp:skryt     # ;
         skryte+V+Ind+Prs:skryter   # ;
    skryte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrytes   # ;
         skryte+V+Ind+Prt:skrøt     # ;
 skryte+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:skraut    # ;
 skryte+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:skrøyt    # ;
          skryte+V+PrfPtc:skrytt    # ;
          skryte+V+PrsPtc:skrytende # ;

LEXICON SKULLE
     skulle+V+Inf:skulle  # ;
 skulle+V+Ind+Prs:skal    # ;
 skulle+V+Ind+Prt:skulle  # ;
  skulle+V+PrfPtc:skullet # ;

LEXICON SKVETTE
          skvette+V+Inf:skvette    # ;
          skvette+V+Imp:skvett     # ;
      skvette+V+Ind+Prs:skvetter   # ;
 skvette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skvettes   # ;
      skvette+V+Ind+Prt:skvatt     # ;
       skvette+V+PrfPtc:skvettet   # ;
       skvette+V+PrsPtc:skvettende # ;

LEXICON SKYTE
          skyte+V+Inf:skyte    # ;
          skyte+V+Imp:skyt     # ;
      skyte+V+Ind+Prs:skyter   # ;
 skyte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skytes   # ;
      skyte+V+Ind+Prt:skjøt    # ;
      skyte+V+Ind+Prt:skøyt    # ;
      skyte+V+Ind+Prt:skaut    # ;
       skyte+V+PrfPtc:skutt    # ;
       skyte+V+PrsPtc:skytende # ;

LEXICON SKYVE
          skyve+V+Inf:skyve    # ;
          skyve+V+Imp:skyv     # ;
      skyve+V+Ind+Prs:skyver   # ;
 skyve+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skyves   # ;
      skyve+V+Ind+Prt:skjøv    # ;
      skyve+V+Ind+Prt:skauv    # ;
       skyve+V+PrfPtc:skjøvet  # ;
       skyve+V+PrsPtc:skyvende # ;

LEXICON SLEPPE
          sleppe+V+Inf:sleppe    # ;
          sleppe+V+Imp:slepp     # ;
      sleppe+V+Ind+Prs:slepper   # ;
 sleppe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sleppes   # ;
      sleppe+V+Ind+Prt:slapp     # ;
       sleppe+V+PrfPtc:sluppet   # ;
       sleppe+V+PrsPtc:sleppende # ;

LEXICON SLÅSS
     slåss+V+Inf:slåss     # ;
     slåss+V+Imp:slåss     # ;
 slåss+V+Ind+Prs:slåss     # ;
 slåss+V+Ind+Prt:sloss     # ;
  slåss+V+PrsPtc:slåssende # ;

LEXICON SLÅ
          slå+V+Inf:slå     # ;
          slå+V+Imp:slå     # ;
      slå+V+Ind+Prs:slår    # ;
 slå+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:slås    # ;
      slå+V+Ind+Prt:slo     # ;
       slå+V+PrfPtc:slått   # ;
       slå+V+PrsPtc:slående # ;

LEXICON SMELLE
          smelle+V+Inf:smelle    # ;
          smelle+V+Imp:smell     # ;
      smelle+V+Ind+Prs:smeller   # ;
 smelle+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smelles   # ;
      smelle+V+Ind+Prt:smalt     # ;
       smelle+V+PrfPtc:smelt     # ;
       smelle+V+PrsPtc:smellende # ;

LEXICON SMETTE
          smette+V+Inf:smette    # ;
          smette+V+Imp:smett     # ;
      smette+V+Ind+Prs:smetter   # ;
 smette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smettes   # ;
      smette+V+Ind+Prt:smatt     # ;
       smette+V+PrfPtc:smettet   # ;
       smette+V+PrsPtc:smettende # ;

LEXICON SMYGE
             smyge+V+Inf:smyge    # ;
             smyge+V+Imp:smyg     # ;
         smyge+V+Ind+Prs:smyger   # ;
    smyge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smyges   # ;
         smyge+V+Ind+Prt:smøg     # ;
 smyge+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:smøyg    # ;
 smyge+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:smaug    # ;
          smyge+V+PrfPtc:smøget   # ;
          smyge+V+PrsPtc:smygende # ;

LEXICON SMØRE
          smøre+V+Inf:smøre    # ;
          smøre+V+Imp:smør     # ;
      smøre+V+Ind+Prs:smører   # ;
 smøre+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smøres   # ;
      smøre+V+Ind+Prt:smurte   # ;
       smøre+V+PrfPtc:smurt    # ;
       smøre+V+PrsPtc:smørende # ;

LEXICON SNIKE
          snike+V+Inf:snike    # ;
          snike+V+Imp:snik     # ;
      snike+V+Ind+Prs:sniker   # ;
 snike+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:snikes   # ;
      snike+V+Ind+Prt:sneik    # ;
      snike+V+Ind+Prt:snek     # ;
       snike+V+PrfPtc:sneket   # ;
       snike+V+PrsPtc:snikende # ;

LEXICON SNYTE
          snyte+V+Inf:snyte    # ;
          snyte+V+Imp:snyt     # ;
      snyte+V+Ind+Prs:snyter   # ;
 snyte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:snytes   # ;
      snyte+V+Ind+Prt:snøt     # ;
      snyte+V+Ind+Prt:snøyt    # ;
       snyte+V+PrfPtc:snytt    # ;
       snyte+V+PrsPtc:snytende # ;

LEXICON SOVE
        sove+V+Inf:sove    # ;
        sove+V+Imp:sov     # ;
    sove+V+Ind+Prs:sover   # ;
    sove+V+Ind+Prt:sov     # ;
 sove+V+Ind+PrfPtc:sovet   # ;
     sove+V+PrsPtc:sovende # ;

LEXICON SPINNE
          spinne+V+Inf:spinne    # ;
          spinne+V+Imp:spinn     # ;
      spinne+V+Ind+Prs:spinner   # ;
 spinne+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:spinnes   # ;
      spinne+V+Ind+Prt:spant     # ;
       spinne+V+PrfPtc:spunnet   # ;
       spinne+V+PrsPtc:spinnende # ;

LEXICON SPREKKE
          sprekke+V+Inf:sprekke    # ;
          sprekke+V+Imp:sprekk     # ;
      sprekke+V+Ind+Prs:sprekker   # ;
 sprekke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sprekkes   # ;
      sprekke+V+Ind+Prt:sprakk     # ;
       sprekke+V+PrfPtc:sprukket   # ;
       sprekke+V+PrsPtc:sprekkende # ;

LEXICON SPRETTE
           sprette+V+Inf:sprette    #          ;
           sprette+V+Imp:sprett     #          ;
       sprette+V+Ind+Prs:spretter   #          ;
  sprette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sprettes   #          ;
       sprette+V+Ind+Prt:spratt     #          ;
        sprette+V+PrfPtc:sprettet   #          ;
        sprette+V+PrsPtc:sprettende #          ;

! extra lexicon, but with one potential error. prevented compilation though, so
! commenting out.

! LEXICON SPRETTE
!          sprette+V+Inf:sprette    #          ;
!          sprette+V+Imp:sprett     #          ;
!      sprette+V+Ind+Prs:spretter   #          ;
! sprette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sprettes   #          ;
!      sprette+V+Ind+Prt:datt       #          ;
!       sprette+V+PrfPtc:sprettet   #          ;
!       sprette+V+PrsPtc:sprett     prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON SPRINGE
     springe+V+Inf:springe    # ;
     springe+V+Imp:spring     # ;
 springe+V+Ind+Prs:springer   # ;
 springe+V+Ind+Prt:sprang     # ;
  springe+V+PrfPtc:sprunget   # ;
  springe+V+PrsPtc:springende # ;

LEXICON SPØRRE
          spørre+V+Inf:spørre    # ;
          spørre+V+Imp:spør      # ;
      spørre+V+Ind+Prs:spør      # ;
 spørre+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:spørres   # ;
      spørre+V+Ind+Prt:spurte    # ;
       spørre+V+PrfPtc:spurt     # ;
       spørre+V+PrsPtc:spørrende # ;

LEXICON STELE
          stele+V+Inf+Radical:stele    # ;
          stele+V+Imp+Radical:stel     # ;
      stele+V+Ind+Prs+Radical:steler   # ;
 stele+V+Ind+Prs+Pass+Radical:steles   # ;
      stele+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:stal     # ;
       stele+V+PrfPtc+Radical:stelt    # ;
       stele+V+PrsPtc+Radical:stelende # ;
