src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON irregular-verb
            kvede:         KVEDE   ;
                lide:     LIDE    ;
            ride:         RIDE    ;
              skli       SKLI    ;
             skride:        SKRIDE  ;
         underskride:under       SKRIDE  ;
         overskride.over       SKRIDE  ;
             skrike:        SKRIKE  ;
           illskrike:ill       SKRIKE  ;
           småskrike:små       SKRIKE  ;
            av       SKRIVE  ;
            be       SKRIVE  ;
          fore       SKRIVE  ;
           fra       SKRIVE  ;
          fram       SKRIVE  ;
          frem       SKRIVE  ;
           god       SKRIVE  ;
            ny       SKRIVE  ;
            om       SKRIVE  ;
          rein       SKRIVE  ;
           ren       SKRIVE  ;
        sammen       SKRIVE  ;
         under       SKRIVE  ;
            ut       SKRIVE  ;
            be       SKYTE   ;
           inn       SKYTE   ;
         knopp       SKYTE   ;
            an       SLÅ     ;
            av       SLÅ     ;
            be       SLÅ     ;
          fore       SLÅ     ;
        jernbe       SLÅ     ;
          skam       SLÅ     ;
          leke       SLÅSS   ;
           små       SLÅSS   ;
          over       SMØRE   ;
            på       SMØRE   ;
            be       SOVE    ;
           for       SOVE    ;
          halv       SOVE    ;
           små       SOVE    ;
         snork       SOVE    ;
         etter       SPØRRE  ;
          fore       SPØRRE  ;
           råd       SPØRRE  ;
            ut       SPØRRE  ;
LEXICON regular-verb
innskrive:inn SKRIVE  ;
